Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 5 Animals Suspected of Bearing
Any Residue Causing
Contaminated Meat

Cross references.

Authority of Commissioner of Agriculture to impose penalty in lieu of other action, §

2-2-10

.

26-2-180.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture.

“Contaminate” means to cause the loss of wholesomeness for human consumption.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 335, § 1.

26-2-181.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The Commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to govern the sampling and inspection of animals, poultry, and products quarantined or detained pursuant to this article and to implement and enforce this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 335, § 5.

26-2-182.
Animals, poultry, or products thereof suspected of bearing substance causing contamination — Inspection and quarantine; notice to owners or keepers.

The Commissioner or his duly authorized representative is authorized to inspect and quarantine or detain upon the premises where found any animals, poultry, or animal and poultry products suspected of bearing or containing a residue of any pesticide, insecticide, herbicide, drug, or any substance that would cause the resultant meat or product to be deemed contaminated.

Notice of the quarantine or detention shall be given to the owners or keepers of said animals, poultry, or products and to the owners or operators of the premises where the suspected contaminated matter is found.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 335, § 2.

Cross references.

Quarantine and inspection duties of Commissioner pertaining to prevention of spread of parasitic livestock diseases, §

4-4-60

et seq.

26-2-183.
Animals, poultry, or products thereof suspected of bearing substance causing contamination — Sampling; removal from quarantine on order of Commissioner.

All animals, poultry, or animal and poultry products suspected of bearing or containing a contaminating residue shall be quarantined or detained at the premises where found until sufficient sampling conducted under the authority of the Commissioner has been completed to determine that the resultant meat or product is wholesome and fit for human consumption. No such animal, poultry, or product shall be moved from quarantine or detention except by order of the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 335, § 3.

26-2-184.
Animals, poultry, or products thereof suspected of bearing substance causing contamination — Destruction; compliance with federal tolerances.

If animals, poultry, or animal and poultry products quarantined or detained contain such contaminating residue that remains in excess of a safe level for human consumption, the Commissioner is authorized to order the animals, poultry, or animal and poultry products to be destroyed in a manner prescribed for the particular contaminating residue. Tolerances established by the United States Food and Drug Administration shall be complied with in enforcing this and other Code sections of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 335, § 4.

26-2-185.
Injunctions.

In addition to the remedies provided in this article and notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and notwithstanding the pendency of any criminal prosecution, the Commissioner is authorized to apply to the superior courts of this state for injunctive relief. Such courts shall have the jurisdiction, upon hearing and for cause shown, to grant a temporary or permanent injunction or ex parte restraining order enjoining or restraining the violation or continuation of a violation of this article or for the failure or refusal to comply with this article or any rule or regulation promulgated under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 335, § 7.

26-2-186.
Penalties.

Any person who violates this article or the rules and regulations promulgated under this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 335, § 6.